Utah statutes.
41-3-501.   Special plates -- Dealers -- Dismantlers -- Manufacturers -- Remanufacturers -- Transporters -- Restrictions on use.

(1)  Except as provided under this chapter, a dealer may operate or move a motor vehicle displaying a dealer plate issued by the division upon the highways without registering it under Title 41, Chapter 1a, Motor Vehicle Act, if the dealer owns or possesses the motor vehicle by consignment for resale.

(2)  A dismantler may operate or move a motor vehicle displaying a dismantler plate issued by the division without registering it as required under Title 41, Chapter 1a, Motor Vehicle Act, upon the highways solely to transport the motor vehicle:

(a)  from the place of purchase or legal acquisition to the place of business for dismantling; or

(b)  to the place of business of a licensed crusher for disposal.

(3)  A manufacturer or remanufacturer may operate or move  a manufactured or remanufactured motor vehicle displaying a manufacturer plate issued by the division upon the highways without registering it as required under Title 41, Chapter 1a, Motor Vehicle Act, solely to:

(a)  deliver the motor vehicle to a dealer; or

(b)  demonstrate a motor vehicle to a dealer or prospective dealer.

(4) (a)  A transporter may operate or move a motor vehicle displaying a transporter plate issued by the division upon the highways without registering it as required under Title 41, Chapter 1a, Motor Vehicle Act, solely:

(i)  from the point of repossession to a financial institution or to the place of storage, so that a financial institution may provide for operation of a repossessed motor vehicle by a prospective purchaser;

(ii)  to and from a detail or repair shop for the purpose of detailing or repairing the motor vehicle; or

(iii)  to a delivery point in, out, or through the state.

(b)  This subsection does not include loaded motor vehicles subject to the gross laden weight provision of Title 41, Chapter 1a, Motor Vehicle Act.

(5)  Dealer plates may not be used:

(a) (i)  on a motor vehicle leased or rented for compensation; or

(ii)  in lieu of registration, on a motor vehicle sold by the dealer; or

(b)  on a loaded motor vehicle over 12,000 pounds gross laden weight unless a special loaded demonstration permit is obtained from the division.

